District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.14

Disciplinary reporting requirements.

(a)

If a nurse staffing agency knows of an action taken by, or of a condition affecting the fitness to practice of, a Licensed Practical Nurse or a Registered Nurse provided or referred by that agency that might be grounds for enforcement or disciplinary action under Chapter 12 of Title 3, the agency shall report the action or condition to the Board, with the exception that an agency is not required under this section to make a report that would be in violation of any federal or District of Columbia law concerning the confidentiality of alcohol and drug abuse treatment records.

(b)

If a nurse staffing agency knows of an action taken by a Certified Nurse Aide provided or referred by that agency that might be grounds for listing that individual on the Nurse Aide Abuse Registry pursuant to Chapter 32 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, the agency shall report the action to the Department.

History

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 14, 50 DCR 10914